Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-103. A. 1. There is hereby created the State Board


of Health, which shall be an advisory body to the State Commissioner


of Health and shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the


Governor and confirmed by the Senate for regular terms of nine (9)


years, except as hereinafter otherwise indicated. Effective January


14, 2019, all duties and powers of the Board shall be transferred to


the Commissioner. Any provision in statute that provides to the


Board authority that is not advisory in nature shall be deemed to


grant the duty or power to the Commissioner.

Req. No. 2645 Page 1


2. Not less than four members shall hold a current license to


practice medicine in this state pursuant to the Oklahoma Allopathic


Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act and the Oklahoma


Osteopathic Medicine Act. At least one physician member shall be a


person licensed to practice medicine in this state by the State


Board of Osteopathic Examiners. Physician members licensed by the


State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision shall be members of


the Oklahoma State Medical Association. One physician member shall


be a diplomate of the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology or


be similarly qualified.


3. Not less than two members shall possess at least five (5)


years of executive leadership experience in a health-related


business or industry, and whose education and experience includes,


but is not limited to, fiduciary, legal, business planning, or


operational decision-making authority.


B. 1. The term of office of one member shall expire on June


30, 1964, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall


be a resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Creek,


Lincoln, Okfuskee, Seminole, Pottawatomie, Pontotoc, Hughes,


Johnston, and Coal.


2. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1965, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a

Req. No. 2645 Page 2


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Blaine,


Kingfisher, Canadian, Caddo, Grady, Comanche, Stephens, Jefferson,


and Cotton.


3. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1966, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Le Flore,


Latimer, Pittsburg, Atoka, Pushmataha, McCurtain, Choctaw, Bryan,


Marshall, Carter, and Love.


4. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1967, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Cimarron,


Texas, Beaver, Harper, Woodward, Woods, Major, Alfalfa, Grant,


Garfield, Kay, and Noble.


5. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1968, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Adair,

Req. No. 2645 Page 3


Sequoyah, Cherokee, Wagoner, Muskogee, Haskell, McIntosh, and


Okmulgee.


6. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1969, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Ottawa,


Delaware, Craig, Mayes, Nowata, Rogers, Washington, Tulsa, Pawnee,


and Osage.


7. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1970, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Logan,


Oklahoma, Cleveland, McClain, Garvin, Murray, and Payne.


8. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1971, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be a


resident of one of the following counties and shall have been a


resident of one or more of such counties for not less than five (5)


years immediately preceding such member’s appointment: Ellis,


Dewey, Roger Mills, Custer, Beckham, Washita, Kiowa, Greer, Jackson,


Harmon, and Tillman.


9. The term of office of one member shall expire on June 30,


1972, and each nine (9) years thereafter, and such member shall be

Req. No. 2645 Page 4


appointed from the State of Oklahoma this state at large, and shall


have been a resident of the state for not less than five (5) years


immediately preceding such member’s appointment.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-104, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-104. A. The State Commissioner Board of Health may


adopt an official seal for the State Department of Health. The


State Commissioner of Health Board shall hold such meetings as he or


she it deems necessary.


B. The Commissioner Board shall have the following powers and


duties:


1. Appoint and fix the compensation of the State Commissioner


of Health;


2. Adopt such rules and standards as he or she the Board deems


necessary to carry out any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Public


Health Code;


2. 3. Accept and disburse grants, allotments, gifts, devises,


bequests, funds, appropriations, and other property made or offered


to the Department; and


3. 4. Establish such divisions, sections, bureaus, offices, and


positions in the State Department of Health as the Commissioner


Board deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code.


C. The State Commissioner of Health shall be appointed by the


Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. The

Req. No. 2645 Page 5


Commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor Board and


may be removed or replaced without cause. Compensation for the


Commissioner shall be determined pursuant to Section 3601.2 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-105, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-105. There is hereby created a State Department of


Health, which shall consist of the State Commissioner of Health, and


such divisions, sections, bureaus, offices, and positions as may be


established by the Commissioner State Board of Health, or by law.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2645 DC 1/9/2026 11:20:03 PM























Req. No. 2645 Page 6